Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-5] County emergency management
agency. (a) The mayor of each county shall have direct responsibility for
emergency management within the county, including the organization,
administration, and operation of a county emergency management agency.

(b) Each county emergency management agency
shall perform emergency management functions within the territorial limits of
the county within which it is organized, coordinate all emergency management
plans within the county, and cooperate as closely as possible with the agency
and emergency management agencies in the other counties in all aspects of
emergency management.

(c) Each county shall be responsible for the
establishment, naming, and operation of a county emergency management agency
under the mayor's direction, and shall enact ordinances to establish the county
emergency management agency and ensure that the mayor and the county's
emergency management agency have the powers necessary to receive state and
federal funds and carry out the functions of this chapter at the county level.
The ordinances shall comply with powers established under sections 127A-12 and 127A-13.

(d) Each county,
under the mayor's direction, shall make
appropriations and authorize expenditures for the purposes of this chapter,
including for use as matching funds for federal aid, out of the normal revenues
or fund balances or surpluses of the counties, notwithstanding any legal
restrictions upon the purposes for which the funds may be expended, except that
pension and retirement funds, funds set aside for the redemption of bonds or
the payment of interest thereon, trust funds, loan funds, and funds received
from the federal government or from any person for specific purposes shall not
be affected.

(e) Each county, under the mayor's direction,
shall provide a county-level administrator or director of the county emergency
management agency, and technical, administrative, and other personnel; office
space; furniture; equipment; supplies; and funds necessary to carry out the purposes
of this chapter.

(f) The administrator or director of the
county emergency management agency shall be subject to chapter 76.

(g) Each county, under
the mayor's direction, shall, in order to ensure
continuity of government during an emergency period, establish a procedure for
the appointment and designation of stand-by officers for the mayor and the
county legislative body during an emergency period, who shall serve in the
event of the unavailability of the officers for whom they are standing-by.

(h) Each county, under
the mayor's direction, shall establish and
maintain an emergency operations center, as the place from where emergencies
and disasters shall be managed, and staff it appropriately.

(i) Each county, under
the mayor's direction, shall coordinate,
develop, and implement an emergency operations plan for the county. [L 2014, c
111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next